Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Article 6. Contract Formation and Modification.

Administrative Code. —

For contract formation and modification, see 2 AAC 12, art. 10.

Collateral references. —

Effect of stipulation, in public building or construction contract, that alterations or extras must be ordered in writing. 1 ALR3d 1273.

Validity and construction of “no damage” clause with respect to delay in building or construction contract. 74 ALR3d 187.

Construction contract provision excusing delay caused by “severe weather”. 85 ALR3d 1085.

Sec. 36.30.340.
Review and approval by the Attorney General.

If a contract contains a term that is in conflict with a state standard form contract term or if a standard term is deleted or modified by a term that is not standard, the contract must be reviewed by the Attorney General and approved as to form.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For contract formation and modification, see 2 AAC 12, art. 10.

Sec. 36.30.350.
Solicitation cancellation, bid and proposal rejection, and delay of opening bid or proposal.

An invitation to bid, a request for proposals, or other solicitation may be cancelled or any or all bids or proposals may be rejected in whole or in part or the date for opening bids or proposals may be delayed when it is in the best interests of the state in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner. The reasons for cancellation, rejection, or delay in opening bids or proposals shall be made part of the contract file.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed bidding; multistep bidding, see 2 AAC 12, art. 3.

For competitive sealed proposals, see 2 AAC 12, art. 4.

For design-build construction contracts, see 2 AAC 12, art. 16.

Sec. 36.30.360.
Determination of nonresponsibility.

A written determination of nonresponsibility of a bidder or offeror shall be made by the procurement officer in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner. The unreasonable failure of a bidder or offeror to promptly supply information in connection with an inquiry with respect to responsibility is grounds for a determination of nonresponsibility with respect to the bidder or offeror.

Information furnished by a bidder or offeror under (a) of this section is confidential and may not be disclosed without prior written consent by the bidder or offeror.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 14 ch 102 SLA 1989)

Administrative Code. —

For contract formation and modification, see 2 AAC 12, art. 10.

Sec. 36.30.362.
Award of a contract to a nonresident.

Except for awards made under AS

36.30.170

, if the procurement officer awards a contract to a person who does not reside or maintain a place of business in the state and if the supplies, services, professional services, or construction that is the subject of the contract could have been obtained from sources in the state, the procurement officer shall issue a written statement explaining the basis of the award. The statement required under this section shall be kept in the contract file.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 15 ch 102 SLA 1989)

Sec. 36.30.365.
Notice of intent to award a contract.

At least 10 days before the formal award of a contract that is not for construction, and at least five days before the award of a construction contract, under this chapter, except for a contract awarded under AS

36.30.300

—

36.30.320

, the procurement officer shall provide to each bidder or offeror notice of intent to award a contract.
The notice must conform to regulations adopted by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 18 ch 65 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed bidding; multistep bidding, see 2 AAC 12, art. 3.

For competitive sealed proposals, see 2 AAC 12, art. 4.

For design-build construction contracts, see 2 AAC 12, art. 16.

Sec. 36.30.370.
Permissible types of contracts.

Any type of contract that will promote the best interests of the state may be used, except that the use of a cost-plus-a-percentage-of-cost contract is prohibited.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 8 ch 37 SLA 1993)

Sec. 36.30.380.
Approval of accounting system. [Repealed, § 24 ch 65 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 36.30.390.
Contract term and cancellation.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a contract for supplies, services, or professional services may be entered into for any period of time considered to be in the best interests of the state provided the term of the contract and conditions of renewal or extension, if any, are included in the solicitation and funds are available for the first fiscal period at the time of contracting. Payment and performance obligations for succeeding fiscal periods shall be subject to the availability and appropriation of funds for them.

Before using a multi-term contract, the procurement officer shall determine in writing that

estimated requirements cover the period of the contract and are reasonably firm and continuing; and

the contract will serve the best interests of the state by encouraging effective competition or otherwise promoting economies in state procurement.

When funds are not appropriated or otherwise made available to support continuation of performance in a subsequent fiscal period, the contract shall be cancelled. The contractor may only be reimbursed for the reasonable value of any nonrecurring costs incurred but not amortized in the price of the supplies, services, or professional services delivered under the contract that are not otherwise recoverable. The cost of cancellation may be paid from any appropriations available for these purposes.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.400.
Required cost and pricing data and contract provisions.

Before an award of a contract or a change order or contract modification, the contractor or prospective contractor shall submit cost and pricing data. The contractor or prospective contractor shall certify that, to the best of the contractor’s or prospective contractor’s knowledge and belief, the data submitted is accurate, complete, and current as of a mutually determined specified date and will continue to be accurate and complete during the performance of the contract.

When a contractor becomes aware of a situation that may form the basis of a claim for compensation that exceeds the amount designated as the base amount of the contract and before performing additional work or supplying additional materials, the contractor shall submit cost and pricing data on the additional work or materials. The contractor shall certify that, to the best of the contractor’s knowledge and belief, the data submitted is accurate, complete, and current and is the actual cost to the contractor of performing the additional work or supplying the additional materials.

A contract, change order, or contract modification under which a certificate is required under (a) or (b) of this section must contain a provision that the price to the state, including the contractor’s profit or fee, will be adjusted to exclude any significant sums by which the state finds that the price is increased because the cost or pricing data furnished by the contractor or prospective contractor is inaccurate, incomplete, or not current as of the date agreed upon by the parties.

The requirements of (a) of this section do not apply when

the contract price is based on adequate price competition;

the contract price is set by law or regulation; or

it is determined by the procurement officer in writing and in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner that the requirements of (a) of this section may be waived, and the reasons for waiver are stated.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For contract formation and modification, see 2 AAC 12, art. 10.

Sec. 36.30.410.
Right to inspect plant.

The state may, at reasonable times, inspect the part of the plant or place of business of a contractor or subcontractor that is related to the performance of a contract awarded or to be awarded by an agency.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For contract formation and modification, see 2 AAC 12, art. 10.

Sec. 36.30.420.
Right to audit records.

The state may, at reasonable times and places, audit the books and records of a person who has submitted cost or pricing data under AS

36.30.400

to the extent that the books and records relate to the cost or pricing data. A person who receives a contract, change order, or contract modification for which cost or pricing data is required, shall maintain books and records that relate to the cost or pricing data for three years after the date of final payment under the contract, unless a shorter period is authorized in writing by the commissioner.

The state may audit the books and records of a contractor or a subcontractor to the extent that the books and records relate to the performance of the contract or subcontract. Books and records shall be maintained by the contractor for a period of three years after the date of final payment under the prime contract and by the subcontractor for a period of three years after the date of final payment under the subcontract, unless a shorter period is authorized in writing by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For contract formation and modification, see 2 AAC 12, art. 10.

Sec. 36.30.430.
Contract clauses.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations permitting the inclusion of clauses providing for adjustments in prices, time of performance, or other contract provisions as appropriate.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations permitting or requiring the inclusion in state contracts of clauses providing for appropriate remedies and covering the following subjects:

liquidated damages;

specified excuses for delay or nonperformance;

termination of the contract for default; and

termination of the contract in whole or in part for the convenience of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For contract formation and modification, see 2 AAC 12, art. 10.

Collateral references. —

Construction and effect of “changed conditions” clause in public works or construction contract with state or its subdivision. 56 ALR4th 1042.

Sec. 36.30.460.
Modification of standard clauses.

The procurement officer or the head of a contracting agency may vary the clauses adopted under AS

36.30.430

for inclusion in a particular state contract if the

variations are supported by a written determination that states the circumstances justifying the variation; and

approval required by AS

36.30.340

is obtained.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.470.
Fiscal effects of construction contract modifications.

A contract modification, change order, or contract price adjustment under a construction contract in excess of an amount established by regulation of the commissioner is subject to prior written certification by the fiscal officer of the agency responsible for funding the project or the contract, or other official responsible for monitoring and reporting upon the status of the costs of the total project budget or contract budget, as to the effect of the contract modification, change order, or adjustment in contract price on the total project budget or the total contract budget. If the certification of the fiscal officer or other responsible official discloses a resulting increase in the total project budget or the total contract budget, the procurement officer may not approve the contract modification, change order, or adjustment in contract price unless sufficient funds are available, or the scope of the project or contract is adjusted to permit the degree of completion that is feasible within the total project budget or total contract budget as it existed before the contract modification, change order, or adjustment in contract price under consideration. A contract modification, change order, or adjustment in contract that is signed by both parties and has been reasonably relied on by a contractor is presumed to be valid even if the provisions of this section have not been met.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.480.
Establishment and modification of cost principles.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations setting out cost principles that shall be used to determine the allowability of incurred costs for the purpose of reimbursing costs under contract provisions that provide for the reimbursement of costs. If a written determination is approved at a level above the procurement officer, the cost principles may be modified by contract.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For contract formation and modification, see 2 AAC 12, art. 10.